nb: Markørtekstfarge: Svart; Blå; Grønn; Rød; Hvit; Gul; Annet
ko: 마커 텍스트 색상: 검은색; 블루; 녹색; 레드; 화이트; 옐로우; 기타
tr: İşaretleyici metin rengi: Siyah; Mavi; Yeşil; Kızıl; Beyaz; Sarı; Diğer
sl-SI: Barva besedila označevalca: Črna; Moder; Zeleno; Rdeči; Belo; Rumen; Drugo
pt-PT: Cor do texto do marcador: Preto; Azul; Verde; Tinto; Branco; Amarelo; Outro
fi: Merkin tekstin väri: Musta; Sininen; Vihreä; Punainen; Valkoinen; Keltainen; Muu
zh-CN: 标记文字颜色: 黑色; 蓝色; 青香型; 红色; 白色; 黄色; 其他
lt-LT: Žymeklio teksto spalva: Juoda; Mėlyna; Žalia; Raudona; Balta; Geltona; Kita
vi: Màu chữ dấu đánh dấu: Màu đen; Màu xanh dương; Màu xanh lá cây; Màu đỏ; Màu trắng; Màu vàng; Khác
pt-BR: Cor do texto do marcador: Preto; Azul; Verde; Vermelho; Branco; Amarela; Outro
es: Color del texto del marcador: Negro; Azul; Verde; Rojo; Blanco; Amarillo; Otros
cs: Barva textu značky: Černá; Modrá; Zelená; Červená; Bílá; Žlutá; Jiné
nl: Tekstkleur markering: Zwart; Blauw; Groen; Rood; Wit; Geel; Andere
hu: Jelölő szöveg színe: Fekete; Kék; Zöld; Vörös; Fehér; Sárga; Egyéb
bg-BG: Цвят на текста на маркера: Черна; Синьо; Зелен; Червено; Бяло; Жълто; Други
ja: マーカーテキストの色: ブラック; ブルー; グリーン; レッド; ホワイト; イエロー; その他
hr-HR: Boja teksta markera: Crna; Plava; Zelena; Crvena; Bijela; Žuta; Ostalo
sv: Markeringstextfärg: Svart; Blå; Grön; Röd; Vit; Gul; Övrigt
th: สีข้อความตัวทำเครื่องหมาย: สีดำ; น้ำเงิน; สีเขียว; แดง; ขาว; สีเหลือง; อื่นๆ
en: Marker text color: Black; Blue; Green; Red; White; Yellow; Other
ro-RO: Culoare text marcator: Brunet; Albastru; Verde; Roșu; Alb; Galben; Altele
zh-TW: 標記器文字顏色: 黑色; 藍色; 綠色調; 紅; 白; 黃色; 其他
de: Markierungstextfarbe: Schwarz; Blau; Grün; Rot; Weiß; Gelb; Sonstiges
da: Markørtekstfarve: Sort; Blå; Grøn; Rød; Hvid; Gul; Andet
ru: Цвет текста маркера: Черный; Синий; Зеленый; Красный; Белый; Желтый; Другой
it: Colore del testo del marcatore: Nero; Blu; Verde; Rosso; Bianco; Giallo; Altro
sk-SK: Farba textu na fixke: Čierny; Modrý; Zelený; Červený; Biely; Žltý; Iné
pl: Kolor tekstu znacznika: Czarny; Niebieski; Zielony; Czerwony; Biały; Żółty; Inne
el: Χρώμα κειμένου δείκτη: Μαύρο; Μπλε; Πράσινο; Κόκκινο; Λευκό; Κίτρινο; Άλλο
fr: Couleur du texte du marqueur: Noir; Bleu; Vert; Rouge; Blanc; Jaune; Autre